src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BÅVSÅ !!= @CODE@ Like MUORRA, only in plural. All, except ganta, juvdá and ávta, have regular, singular stem counterparts.
                                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>             R        ;
                                 +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>Q1j          R        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Nom:%>Q1           K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Gen:%>Q1j          K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt         K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda        K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Ela:%>Q1js         K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn         K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Com:%>Q1j          K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Nom:%>Q1%>         PxNomPlV ; !
                                    +N+Pl+Gen:%>Q1j%>        PxC      ; !
                                    +N+Pl+Acc:%>Q1jd%>       PxC      ; !
                                    +N+Pl+Ill:%>Q1jdis%>     PxCs     ; !
                                    +N+Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn%>       PxC      ; !
                                    +N+Pl+Ela:%>Q1jst%>      PxC      ; !
                                    +N+Pl+Com:%>Q1j%>        PxC      ; !
                                       +N+Ess:%>n            K        ;
                                       +N+Abe:%>Q1dak        K        ;
                                       +N+Abe:%>Q1da         K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#dagi     K        ;
                                    +N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#dagá     K        ;
                           +Err/Orth+N+Pl+Abe:%>Q1j#tagá     K        ;
                            +N+Der1+Der/Car+A:»Q1            DIBME    ;
                       +N+Der1+Der/Car+A+Attr:»Q1dis%>       ATTR     ;
                            +N+Der1+Der/Car+A:»Q1d           DUVVAT   ;
!                           +N+Der1+Der/Car+A:»Q1dis         VUOHTA   ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»Q1g AHTES ;Only for odd-syllble stems
!                           +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»Q1d           AHTES    ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X7tja         K        ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X7tjij        K        ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X7tjijt       K        ;
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X7tjijd%>     PxCs     ; !
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X7tjijda      K        ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X7tjijn       K        ;
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X7tjijn%>     PxCs     ; !
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X7tjijs       K        ;
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X7tjijst%>    PxCs     ; !
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X7tjij        K        ;
                      +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X7tjin        K        ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X7tjij#dagi   K        ;
                   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X7tjij#dagá   K        ;
          +Err/Orth+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:»X7tjij#tagá   K        ;
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X7tja#dagi    K        ; !No Sg when it's a plural noun
!                  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X7tja#dagá    K        ;
!         +Err/Orth+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:»X7tja#tagá    K        ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X7tja»ttja    K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X7tja»ttjaj   K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X7tja»ttjajt  K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X7tja»ttjajda K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:»X7tja»ttjajn  K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:»X7tja»ttjajs  K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X7tja»ttjaj   K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X7tja»ttjin   K        ; !Dobbel diminutiv

!!€gt-norm: båvså # Even-syllable test
!!€ båvså:               båvså+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ båvsåjt:             båvså+N+Pl+Acc




!! !Partially assimilated loanwords. The first part of the word is "citation borrowed" and keeps its norwegian/swedish orthography, only the last two syllables are adapted to sami.
! - - - - - -

LEXICON MUORRA_LOAN !!= @CODE@  For loan words that do not fit in a loan word lexicon because of wrong short cmp, or partially assimilated loanwords without separate lexicas (medállja). This lexicon gives no short compound forms. Potential short cmps must therefore be hard coded into the FirstComponent lexicon. This also for compounded words with partially assimilated loan words. Examples of problem words: sirup>siráhppa og stetoskop>stetoskoahppa.
 +N+OLang/NOB:   MUORRAInfl ;
 +N+OLang/NOB:%> MUORRACmp  ;

LEXICON ADVÆRBBA
 +N+OLang/NOB: ADVÆRBBA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ADVÆRBBA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ærbba with long and short compound-form
            :ærbba%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ærbba%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ærbba»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ærbba»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ærbba»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:erb%>      R                    ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:ærbba%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ærbba%>Q1  R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ærbba%>Q1j R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:erb%>      A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes the old "adverba"

!!€gt-norm: detransitijvvaværbba # Even-syllable test
!!€ detransitijvvaværbba:                 detransitijvvaværbba+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ detransitijvvavärbba:                 detransitijvvaværbba+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ detransitijvvaverbas:                 detransitijvvaværbba+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON KAFIEDJA
 +N+OLang/NOB: KAFIEDJA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON KAFIEDJA_CMP_INFL  !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -edja. Ends on -é in norwegian. Short and long cmp. "Kafea" and "kaféa" are subtaged. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.
               +CmpNP/Pref:e         R                    ; !Short cmp
                  +Area/NO:iedja%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                  +Area/NO:iedja%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
                  +Area/NO:iedja»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                  +Area/NO:iedja»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                  +Area/NO:iedja»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/SgNom:iedja     R                    ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/SgGen:iedjaQ1   R                    ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/PlGen:iedjaQ1j  R                    ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edja%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edja%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edja»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edja»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edja»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/SgNom:edja      R                    ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/SgGen:edjaQ1    R                    ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/PlGen:edjaQ1j   R                    ;
                 +Err/Orth:é%>       A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes the old "kaféa"
                 +Err/Orth:e%>       A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes the old "kafea"

LEXICON DEMAGÅVGGÅ
 +N+OLang/NOB: DEMAGÅVGGÅ_CMP_INFL ;
