src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
alliedja+Sem/Dummytag:all KAFIEDJA ;
arkeolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:arkeol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
astrolåvggå+Sem/Hum:astrol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
auditåvrrå+Sem/Build-room:auditåvrrå MUORRA_LOAN ; ! Not in FAKTÅVRRÅ because of cmp auditorium. 
bajeldisbåvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:bajeldis#båkså BÅVSÅ ;
biolåvggå+Sem/Hum:biol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
brokkålli+Sem/Plant:brokkålli MUORRA_LOAN ;
båvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:båkså BÅVSÅ ;
demagåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:demag DEMAGÅVGGÅ ;
detransitijvvaværbba+Sem/Cat:de^transitijvva#v ADVÆRBBA ;
disska+Sem/Furn_Ctain-abstr:disska MUORRA_LOAN ; !
ditransitijvvaværbba+Sem/Cat:di^transitijvva#v ADVÆRBBA ;
epikuriedja+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:epikur KAFIEDJA ;
etnolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:etnol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ;
evertebráhtta+Area/SE+Sem/Ani:everte^bráhtta MUORRA_LOAN ; ! LOAN Evertebrata er ryggradslöst djur
fiehtarbåvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:fiehtar#båkså BÅVSÅ ;
finihtaværbba+Sem/Cat:finihta#v ADVÆRBBA ; ! 
galsåŋga+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Clth:galsoaŋŋga BÅVSÅ ;
ganta+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:ganta BÅVSÅ ;
geolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:geol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
glássa+Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Obj:glássa MUORRA_LOAN ; ! 
goarromrusta+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj:goarrom#russta BÅVSÅ ;
gynekolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gynekol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ;
habitualværbba+Sem/Cat:habitu^al#v ADVÆRBBA ;
idiedja+Sem/Prod-cogn:id KAFIEDJA ; ! 
infinihtaværbba+Sem/Cat:infinihta#v ADVÆRBBA ;
instrumentpaniella+Area/SE+Sem/Obj-el:in^strument#panella MUORRA_LOAN ;
intransitijvvaværbba+Sem/Cat:in^transitijvva#v ADVÆRBBA ;
juvdá+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:juvddá BÅVSÅ ;
kabariedja+Sem/Event_Food:kabar KAFIEDJA ;
kafiedja+Sem/Plc:kaf KAFIEDJA ; ! Loan words ka/fe-a 
klientælla+Sem/Hum:klientælºla MUORRA_LOAN ;
klisjiedja+Sem/Prod-cogn:klisj KAFIEDJA ; ! 
komitiedja+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group:komit KAFIEDJA ;
konværbba+Sem/Cat:konv ADVÆRBBA ; ! 
kopulaværbba+Sem/Cat:kopula#v ADVÆRBBA ; ! 
kupiedja+Sem/Dummytag:kup KAFIEDJA ;
kuratijvvaværbba+Sem/Cat:kuratijvva#v ADVÆRBBA ;
kuvbba+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kuvbba MUORRA_LOAN ; !
loamssjebåvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ctain:loamssje#båkså BÅVSÅ ;
luovasbáne+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body_Obj:luovas#bádne BÅVSÅ ;
lånåstushiståvrrå+Sem/Domain:lånåstus#histåvrrå MUORRA_LOAN ;
meteorolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:mete^orol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
modalværbba+Sem/Cat:modal#v ADVÆRBBA ;
moskea+Err/Orth+Sem/Build:mosk KAFIEDJA ; ! Moskiedja
musiedja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:musiedja MUORRA_LOAN ; ! Not in KAFIEDJA because of museum 
njálggá+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:njálgºgá BÅVSÅ ; ! º because of weak grade triggers in the lexicon
paragráffa+Sem/Rule:para^gráfºfa MUORRA_LOAN ; !  
passijvvaværbba+Sem/Cat:passijvva#v ADVÆRBBA ; ! 
pedagåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:pedag DEMAGÅVGGÅ ;
proadværbba+Sem/Cat:pro#adv ADVÆRBBA ; ! 
procedijrra+Area/SE+Sem/Dummytag:procedijrra MUORRA_LOAN ;
psykolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:psykol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
radialdæhkka+Sem/Dummytag:radi^al#dæhkka MUORRA_LOAN ;
reksjåvnåværbba+Sem/Cat:reksjåvnå#v ADVÆRBBA ;
resymiedja+Sem/Dummytag:resym KAFIEDJA ;
ruossabágo+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ruossa#báhko BÅVSÅ ;
seloahtta+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:selohtta MUORRA_LOAN ; ! Tilhenger av en jødisk sekt, as written in NT
sierrapedagåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sierra#pedag DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
sisbåvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sis#båkså BÅVSÅ ;
sosiolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sosiol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! GG 
stratosferra+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Plc:strato^sfærºra MUORRA_LOAN ;
suohkankomitiedja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:suohkan#komit KAFIEDJA ;
synagåvggå+Sem/Org:synag DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
telefonkatalåvggå+Sem/Txt:telefon#katal DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
territåvrrå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:territåvrrå MUORRA_LOAN ;
trasiedja+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:tras KAFIEDJA ;
trokiedja+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:trok KAFIEDJA ; ! Loan words ka/fe-a
turniedja+OLang/NOB+Area/NO+Sem/Act:turn KAFIEDJA ; ! 
urolåvggå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:urol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
viehkkeværbba+Sem/Cat:viehkke#v ADVÆRBBA ;
vuornnomværbba+Sem/Cat:vuornnom#v ADVÆRBBA ;
ájggeadværbba+Sem/Cat:ájgge#adv ADVÆRBBA ;
ássjegålo+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ássje#gållo BÅVSÅ ;
ávta+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ávta BÅVSÅ ;
ålgoldisbåvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ålgoldis#båkså BÅVSÅ ;
ånibåvså+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:åni#båkså BÅVSÅ ;
økolåvggå+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ekol DEMAGÅVGGÅ ; ! 
amtmánne+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:amt#mánºne MUORRA_LOAN ; 
